Utah statutes.
19-6-707.   Rebuttable presumption regarding used oil mixtures.
(1) (a)  Used oil containing more than 1000 ppm total halogens is presumed to
be a hazardous waste because it has been mixed with halogenated hazardous
waste listed in 40 CFR 261, Subpart D.
(b)  This presumption may be rebutted by demonstrating the used oil does not
contain hazardous waste, such as by using the analytical method from SW-846,
Edition III, to show the used oil does not contain significant concentrations
of halogenated hazardous constituents as listed by board rule.
(2) (a)  The rebuttable presumption under Subsection (1) does not apply to
metalworking oils or fluids containing chlorinated paraffins, if they are
processed through a tolling agreement to reclaim the metalworking oils or
fluids.
(b)  The rebuttable presumption under Subsection (1) does apply to
metalworking oils or fluids if the oils or fluids are recycled in any other
manner or are disposed.
(3) (a)  The rebuttable presumption under Subsection (1) does not apply to
used oils contaminated with chlorofluorocarbons (CFCs) removed from
refrigeration units when the CFCs are destined for reclamation.
(b)  The rebuttable presumption does apply to used oils contaminated with CFCs
that have been mixed with used oil from sources other than refrigeration
units.
